Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB462.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3 of the act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act, is amended by adding definitions to read:Section 3. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the meanings given to them in this section:* * *"Director." The director of the office.* * *"Office." The Office of Government Efficiency.1234567891011121314151617181920 * * *"Selection committee." The Selection and Organization Committee in the office.* * *Section 2. Section 8.1 of the act is amended to read:Section 8.1. Existing regulations.The commission, on its motion or at the request of any person or member of the General Assembly, may review any existing regulation which has been in effect for at least three years. If a committee of the Senate or the House of Representatives requests a review of an existing regulation, the commission shall perform the review and shall assign it high priority. The commission may submit recommendations to an agency recommending changes in existing regulations if it finds the existing regulations to be contrary to the public interest under the criteria established in section 5.2. The commission may also make recommendations to the General Assembly and the Governor for statutory changes if the commission finds that any existing regulation may be contrary to the public interest. Unless prohibited by the laws of this Commonwealth, at the time an agency promulgates a new regulation, the agency shall identify at least two existing regulations for repeal.Section 3. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 12.2. Office of Government Efficiency . (a) The nonpartisan Office of Government Efficiency is established within the Independent Regulatory Review Commission.(b) The office shall have the following powers and duties:(1) Adopt logical, quantitative and qualitative rules to determine whether an existing statute or regulation of the Commonwealth is:20250SB0462PN0426 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) Unreasonable, unduly burdensome, detrimental to economic well-being, duplicative, onerous, defective or in conflict with another statute or regulation.(ii) Defying a common sense approach to government.(2) Perform a systematic review of existing statutes and regulations of this Commonwealth in accordance with the rules adopted for review under this act.(3) Identify existing statutes and regulations that may be appropriate for legislative and executive agency modification, revision or repeal.(4) Establish as soon as practical a system with a publicly accessible Internet website that allows the office to receive:(i) Suggestions and comments, along with supporting documentation, for modification, revision or repeal from citizens, businesses, government agencies or others.(ii) Reports on allegations of wasteful governmental practices.(5) Determine and implement internal policies, standards and procedures as may be necessary for the orderly and efficient execution of the mission of the office.(6) Implement a tracking system to follow all submissions and actions taken on a recommendation made by the director which includes progress of modification, revision or repeal.(7) By June 30 of each year, report to the General Assembly and the Governor on:(i) Recommended changes to statutes and regulations.(ii) Recommended changes to increase efficiency and eliminate wasteful practices.20250SB0462PN0426 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) Progress of the revision, repeal or abrogation of statutes and regulations.(c) The committee established in the office shall:(1) Consist of the following members:(i) One member appointed by the Governor.(ii) One member appointed by the President pro tempore of the Senate in consultation with the Majority Leader and the Minority Leader of the Senate.(iii) One member appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives in consultation with the Majority Leader and the Minority Leader of the House of Representatives.(2) Within 30 days from the effective date of this section, select a director of the office in accordance with the following:(i) The committee shall provide and transmit the qualifications of the director to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin within 90 days of the first meeting of the committee.(ii) The appointment may not be made on the basis of political affiliation.(iii) The appointment shall be made on the basis of the fitness to perform the duties of the office based on the published qualifications.(d) The director shall appoint a deputy director who shall have the following duties:(1) Perform assigned duties from the director.(2) Assume the role of the director:(i) during an absence or incapacity of the director; 20250SB0462PN0426 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or(ii) if a vacancy occurs in the position of director until a successor director is appointed.(e) The director may be removed by a concurrent resolution passed by the Senate and the House of Representatives.(f) The director shall have the following powers and duties:(1) The authority to:(i) Determine and implement internal policies, standards and protocols to orderly and efficiently carry out the mission of the office under this section.(ii) Procure the temporary or intermittent service of attorneys, experts, consultants or organizations by contract.(2) Hire and fix compensation in accordance with the following:(i) The hiring and appointments shall be made on the basis of the duties of the office and the performance of the functions of the office.(ii) All personnel shall be hired or appointed without regard to political affiliation.(iii) Hiring and appointments shall be based on fitness to perform the necessary duties.(g) (1) When the office determines that a statute or regulation meets the standards set under this section and as set by the director for modification, revision or repeal, the director shall recommend the action to:(i) The General Assembly if a statute needs to be modified, revised or repealed.(ii) The State department or agency that promulgated the regulation that needs to be modified, revised or 20250SB0462PN0426 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 repealed.(2) A recommendation from the office shall provide specific details why the office is recommending that the statute or regulation needs to be modified, revised or repealed.(h) The office shall be a Commonwealth agency for the purposes of the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the "Right-to-Know Law."(i) The office shall be abolished and cease to exist five years from the effective date of this section.Section 4. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0462PN0426 - 6 - 1234567891011